Hawaii statutes.
[§309H-1] Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

"Loan repayment" or "repayment
of loan" means the payment of up to twenty per cent of a Hawaii health
corps program participant's health care training costs including but not
limited to tuition not exceeding $35,000 per year for a maximum of five years
of repayment.

"Nurse practitioner" means a person
licensed as an advanced practice registered nurse under chapter 457.

"Physician" means a person licensed
to practice medicine and surgery, as required by section 453-2.

"Physician assistant" means a person
licensed to practice medicine under the supervision of a physician or
osteopathic physician, as required by section 453-5.3.

"Residency" means a physician or
nurse practitioner participating in an accredited program of post graduate
study. [L 2012, c 187, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next